Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-240.16
Permitted improvements and growing crops of lessee; appraisers; inspection; hear interested parties.

The appraisers shall carefully inspect and view the permitted improvements and growing crops to be valued and shall hear any party interested therein in reference to the value of the permitted improvements to the land and growing crops.

Laws 1967, c. 467, § 7, p. 1453;

Laws 1971, LB 413, § 7.